src/verbs/group-3-verbs.lexc
!+Ver	verb
!+Inf	infinitive
!+PPre	Present Partical
!+PPas	Past Partical
!+Ind	Indicative
!+Sub	subjunctive
!+Con	Conditional
!+Impr	Imperative
!+Pre	present
!+PSim	Simple past
!+Fut	Simple future
!+P1	1st person
!+P2	2nd person
!+P3	3rd person
!+Sg	singular
!+Pl	plural

Multichar_Symbols +Ver +Inf +PPre +PPas +Ind +Sub +Con +Impr +Pre +PSim +Fut +P1 +P2 +P3 +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Verb;

LEXICON Verb
Gruop1_stem;
Group2_stem;
Group3_stem;
Group3_irregular;

LEXICON Group1_suffix
er+Ver:0	Group1_Vinf;

LEXICON Group1_Vinf
+Inf:er						#;
+PPre:eant					#;
+PPas:é						#;
+Ind:0 	Group1_Indicative;
+Sub:0 	Group1_Subjunctive;
+Con:0 	Group1_Conditional;
+Impr:0	Group1_Imperative;

LEXICON Group1_Indicative
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^e				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^es				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^e				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ons				#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ez				#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ent				#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^eais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^eais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^eait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^iez				#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^eaient			#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^eai			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^eas			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^ea				#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^eâmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^eâtes			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^èrent			#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^erai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^eras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^era				#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^erons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^erez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^eront			#;

LEXICON Group1_Subjunctive
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^e				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^es				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^e				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^iez				#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ent				#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^easse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^easses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^eât				#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^eassions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^eassiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^eassent			#;

LEXICON Group1_Conditional
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^erais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^erais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^erait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^erions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^eriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^eraient			#;

LEXICON Group1_Imperative
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^e				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^eons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ez				#;

!========= Group 2 Verbs ===========
LEXICON Group2_stem
fin		Group2_suffix;

LEXICON Group2_suffix
ir+Ver:0	Group2_Vinf;

LEXICON Group2_Vinf
+Inf:ir						#;
+PPre:issant				#;
+PPas:i						#;
+Ind:0 	Group2_Indicative;
+Sub:0 	Group2_Subjunctive;
+Con:0 	Group2_Conditional;
+Impr:0	Group2_Imperative;

LEXICON Group2_Indicative
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^is				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^is				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^it				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^issons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^issez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^issent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^issais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^issais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^issait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^issions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^issiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^issaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^is				#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^is				#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^it				#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^îmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^îtes			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^irent			#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^irai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^iras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^ira				#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^irons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^irez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^iront			#;

LEXICON Group2_Subjunctive
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^isse			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^isses			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^isse			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^issions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^issiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^issent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^isse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^isses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ît				#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^issions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^issiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^issent			#;

LEXICON Group2_Conditional
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^irais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^irais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^irait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^irions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^iriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^iraient			#;

LEXICON Group2_Imperative
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^is				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^issons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^issez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_attre
attre+Ver:0	Group3_Vinf_attre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_attre
+Inf:attre					#;
+PPre:attant				#;
+PPas:attu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_attre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_attre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_attre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_attre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_attre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ats				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ats				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^at				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^attons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^attez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^attent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^attais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^attais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^attait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^attions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^attiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^attaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^attis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^attis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^attit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^attîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^attîtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^attirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^atterai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^atteras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^attera			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^atterons		#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^atterez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^atteront		#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_attre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^atte			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^attes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^atte			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^attions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^attiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^attent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^attasse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^attasses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^attât			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^attassions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^attassiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^attassent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_attre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^atterais		#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^atterais		#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^atterait		#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^atterions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^atteriez		#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^atteraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_attre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ats				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^attons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^attez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_prendre
prendre+Ver:0	Group3_Vinf_prendre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_prendre
+Inf:prendre				#;
+PPre:prenant				#;
+PPas:pris					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_prendre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_prendre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_prendre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_prendre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_prendre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^prends			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^prends			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^prend			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^prenons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^prenez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^prennent		#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^prenais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^prenais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^prenait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^prenions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^preniez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^prenaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^pris			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^pris			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^prit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^prîmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^prîtes			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^prirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^prendrai		#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^prendras		#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^prendra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^prendrons		#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^prendrez		#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^prendront		#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_prendre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^prenne			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^prennes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^prenne			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^prenions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^preniez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^prennent		#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^prisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^prisses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^prît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^prissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^prissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^prissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_prendre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^prendrais		#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^prendrais		#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^prendrait		#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^prendrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^prendriez		#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^prendraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_prendre
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^prends			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^prenons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^prenez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_endre
endre+Ver:e		Group3_Vinf_endre_andre;

LEXICON Group3_suffix_andre
andre+Ver:a		Group3_Vinf_endre_andre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_endre_andre
+Inf:ndre					#;
+PPre:ndant					#;
+PPas:ndu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_endre_andre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_endre_andre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_endre_andre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_endre_andre;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_endre_andre
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^nds				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^nds				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^nd				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^ndons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^ndez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ndent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^ndais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^ndais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^ndait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^ndions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^ndiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^ndaient			#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^ndis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^ndis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^ndit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^ndîmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^ndîtes			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^ndirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^ndrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^ndras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^ndra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^ndrons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^ndrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^ndront			#;

LEXICON Gruop1_stem
abouch	Group1_suffix;
académis	Group1_suffix;
accoud	Group1_suffix;
achopp	Group1_suffix;
affectionn	Group1_suffix;
aiguillonn	Group1_suffix;
amend	Group1_suffix;
ans	Group1_suffix;
arbitr	Group1_suffix;
assembl	Group1_suffix;
augur	Group1_suffix;
bafouill	Group1_suffix;
barricad	Group1_suffix;
blablat	Group1_suffix;
boudin	Group1_suffix;
branch	Group1_suffix;
brusqu	Group1_suffix;
caft	Group1_suffix;
caparaçonn	Group1_suffix;
cas	Group1_suffix;
chaloup	Group1_suffix;
chevauch	Group1_suffix;
chôm	Group1_suffix;
climatis	Group1_suffix;
cohabit	Group1_suffix;
compar	Group1_suffix;
conditionn	Group1_suffix;
constern	Group1_suffix;
convol	Group1_suffix;
courbatur	Group1_suffix;
crev	Group1_suffix;
culbut	Group1_suffix;
dermabras	Group1_suffix;
diminu	Group1_suffix;
divagu	Group1_suffix;
drill	Group1_suffix;
débloqu	Group1_suffix;
décalcifi	Group1_suffix;
déclar	Group1_suffix;
décontract	Group1_suffix;
défauss	Group1_suffix;
dégel	Group1_suffix;
déifi	Group1_suffix;
démin	Group1_suffix;
dénigr	Group1_suffix;
dépolaris	Group1_suffix;
dérégul	Group1_suffix;
désennuy	Group1_suffix;
désoxyd	Group1_suffix;
dévalis	Group1_suffix;
effrit	Group1_suffix;
emmanch	Group1_suffix;
emprisonn	Group1_suffix;
enclav	Group1_suffix;
enflamm	Group1_suffix;
enjôl	Group1_suffix;
ensil	Group1_suffix;
entêt	Group1_suffix;
esquiss	Group1_suffix;
excori	Group1_suffix;
expurg	Group1_suffix;
fan	Group1_suffix;
feul	Group1_suffix;
flaqu	Group1_suffix;
formalis	Group1_suffix;
frein	Group1_suffix;
fustig	Group1_suffix;
garrott	Group1_suffix;
glouglout	Group1_suffix;
gratouill	Group1_suffix;
guerroy	Group1_suffix;
harass	Group1_suffix;
hum	Group1_suffix;
imbib	Group1_suffix;
inclin	Group1_suffix;
inhal	Group1_suffix;
intercal	Group1_suffix;
ironis	Group1_suffix;
jug	Group1_suffix;
laqu	Group1_suffix;
lixivi	Group1_suffix;
macul	Group1_suffix;
marcott	Group1_suffix;
maîtris	Group1_suffix;
miroit	Group1_suffix;
mouchard	Group1_suffix;
mâtin	Group1_suffix;
nationalis	Group1_suffix;
nuanc	Group1_suffix;
ombrag	Group1_suffix;
outr	Group1_suffix;
paraph	Group1_suffix;
pav	Group1_suffix;
personnalis	Group1_suffix;
pill	Group1_suffix;
planqu	Group1_suffix;
pollinis	Group1_suffix;
poutr	Group1_suffix;
propag	Group1_suffix;
prélass	Group1_suffix;
putréfi	Group1_suffix;
raccompagn	Group1_suffix;
ramass	Group1_suffix;
ravag	Group1_suffix;
recommenc	Group1_suffix;
redistribu	Group1_suffix;
rejet	Group1_suffix;
remouill	Group1_suffix;
rentabilis	Group1_suffix;
reprécipit	Group1_suffix;
retouch	Group1_suffix;
ripolin	Group1_suffix;
rudoy	Group1_suffix;
réautoris	Group1_suffix;
référenc	Group1_suffix;
réorient	Group1_suffix;
réutilis	Group1_suffix;
salop	Group1_suffix;
scell	Group1_suffix;
sexualis	Group1_suffix;
solennis	Group1_suffix;
soupes	Group1_suffix;
stationn	Group1_suffix;
suc	Group1_suffix;
surexcit	Group1_suffix;
surévalu	Group1_suffix;
tacl	Group1_suffix;
tchatt	Group1_suffix;
titr	Group1_suffix;
touss	Group1_suffix;
traqu	Group1_suffix;
troqu	Group1_suffix;
télescop	Group1_suffix;
vals	Group1_suffix;
vidang	Group1_suffix;
vout	Group1_suffix;
zérot	Group1_suffix;
écartel	Group1_suffix;
écrou	Group1_suffix;
élimin	Group1_suffix;
éperonn	Group1_suffix;
érotis	Group1_suffix;
évalu	Group1_suffix;
LEXICON Group3_stem
ab		Group3_suffix_attre;
b		Group3_suffix_attre;
comb	Group3_suffix_attre;
déb		Group3_suffix_attre;
rab		Group3_suffix_attre;
reb		Group3_suffix_attre;
éb		Group3_suffix_attre;
contreb	Group3_suffix_attre;
app		Group3_suffix_prendre;
com		Group3_suffix_prendre;
désap	Group3_suffix_prendre;
entre	Group3_suffix_prendre;
mé		Group3_suffix_prendre;
re		Group3_suffix_prendre;
sur		Group3_suffix_prendre;
é		Group3_suffix_prendre;
att		Group3_suffix_endre;
desc	Group3_suffix_endre;
dist	Group3_suffix_endre;
déf		Group3_suffix_endre;
dép		Group3_suffix_endre;
dét		Group3_suffix_endre;
ent		Group3_suffix_endre;
f		Group3_suffix_endre;
p		Group3_suffix_endre;
pourf	Group3_suffix_endre;
prét	Group3_suffix_endre;
redesc	Group3_suffix_endre;
r		Group3_suffix_endre;
rep		Group3_suffix_endre;
ret		Group3_suffix_endre;
rev		Group3_suffix_endre;
réent	Group3_suffix_endre;
susp	Group3_suffix_endre;
t		Group3_suffix_endre;
v		Group3_suffix_endre;
ét		Group3_suffix_endre;
ép		Group3_suffix_andre;
rép		Group3_suffix_andre;
